de: Größe des Golfgriffs: Jumbo; Jumbo Plus; Junior; Damen; Midsize; Oversize; Oversize +1/8; Standard; Standard Plus4; Undersize; Andere
ro-RO: Mărimea mânerului pentru crose de golf: Jumbo; Jumbo Plus; Junior; Damă; Mediu; Supradimensionat; Supradimensionat +1/8; Standard; Standard Plus4; Subdimensionat; Altele
sk-SK: Veľkosť golfového gripu: Jumbo; Jumbo Plus; Junior; Dámska; Midsize; Oversize; Oversize +1/8; Štandardná; Štandardná Plus4; Undersize; Iné
pt-PT: tamanho do grip de golfe: Jumbo; Jumbo Plus; Júnior; Senhoras; Midsize; Oversize; Oversize +1/8; Padrão; Padrão Plus4; Undersize; Outro
sv: Golfgreppstorlek: Jumbo; Jumbo Plus; Junior; Dam; Midsize; Oversize; Oversize +1/8; Standard; Standard Plus4; Undersize; Annan
ja: ゴルフグリップのサイズ: ジャンボ; ジャンボプラス; ジュニア; レディース; ミッドサイズ; オーバーサイズ; オーバーサイズ +1/8; スタンダード; スタンダードプラス4; アンダーサイズ; その他
it: Impugnatura da golf girevole: Jumbo; Jumbo Plus; Junior; Donna; Midsize; Oversize; Oversize +1/8; Standard; Standard Plus4; Undersize; Altro
hu: Golfmarkolat mérete: Jumbo; Jumbo Plus; Junior; Női; Midsize; Oversize; Oversize +1/8; Standard; Standard Plus4; Undersize; Egyéb
pt-BR: Grip de golfe tamanho: Jumbo; Jumbo Plus; Júnior; Feminino; Midsize; Oversize; Oversize +1/8; Padrão; Standard Plus4; Undersize; Outro
el: Μέγεθος λαβής γκολφ: Jumbo; Jumbo Plus; Junior; Γυναικείο (Ladies); Midsize; Oversize; Oversize +1/8; Standard; Standard Plus4; Undersize; Άλλο
es: Tamaño de empuñadura de golf: Jumbo; Jumbo Plus; Júnior; Damas; Mediano; Extragrande; Extragrande +1/8; Estándar; Estándar Plus4; Pequeño; Otro
nb: Størrelse på golfgrep: Jumbo; Jumbo pluss; Junior; Damer; Midsize; Oversize; Oversize +1/8; Standard; Standard Plus4; Undersize; Annet
zh-TW: 高爾夫球桿握把尺寸: 特大; 特大 Plus; 兒童; 女仕; 中等尺寸; 加大; 加大 +1/8; 標準尺寸; 標準 Plus4; 偏小; 其他
pl: Rozmiar gripu golfowego: Jumbo; Jumbo Plus; Junior; Damski; Midsize; Oversize; Oversize +1/8; Standardowy; Standard Plus4; Undersize; Inny
hr-HR: Veličina hvata za golf: Jumbo; Jumbo Plus; Junior; Ženski; Srednje; Oversize; Oversize +1/8; Standardno; Standard Plus4; Undersize; Ostalo
fi: Golfmailan kahvan koko: Jumbo; Jumbo Plus; Junior; Naisten; Midsize; Oversize; Oversize +1/8; Standardi; Standard Plus4; Undersize; Muu
vi: Kích thước tay cầm gậy golf: Jumbo; Jumbo Plus; Trẻ em; Nữ; Cỡ trung (Midsize); Cỡ lớn (Oversize); Cỡ lớn +1/8; Tiêu chuẩn; Tiêu chuẩn Plus4; Cỡ nhỏ (Undersize); Khác
fr: Taille du grip de golf: Jumbo; Jumbo Plus; Junior; Femme; Moyen; Surdimensionné; Surdimensionné +1/8; Standard; Standard Plus4; Sous-dimensionné; Autre
en: Golf grip size: Jumbo; Jumbo Plus; Junior; Ladies; Midsize; Oversize; Oversize +1/8; Standard; Standard Plus4; Undersize; Other
tr: Golf sopası sapı boyutu: Jumbo; Jumbo Plus; Junior; Kadın; Orta boy; Büyük boy; Büyük boy +1/8; Standart; Standart Plus4; Küçük boy; Diğer
cs: Velikost golfového gripu: Jumbo; Jumbo Plus; Juniorská; Dámská; Midsize; Oversize; Oversize +1/8; Standardní; Standard Plus4; Undersize; Ostatní
zh-CN: 高尔夫球握把尺寸: 超大码; 特大码; 少年码; 女士码; 中码; 加大码; 加大码 +1/8; 标准码; 标准码 Plus4; 偏小码; 其他
da: Størrelse på golfgreb: Jumbo; Jumbo Plus; Junior; Damer; Midsize; Oversize; Oversize +1/8; Standard; Standard Plus4; Undersize; Anden
ko: 골프 그립 크기: 점보; 점보 플러스; 주니어; 여성용; 미드사이즈; 오버사이즈; 오버사이즈 +1/8; 스탠다드; 스탠다드 플러스4; 언더사이즈; 기타
bg-BG: Размер на дръжката за голф стик: Jumbo; Jumbo Plus; За юноши; Дамски; Среден размер; Увеличен размер (Oversize); Увеличен размер (Oversize) +1/8; Стандартен; Standard Plus4; Намален размер (Undersize); Друго
sl-SI: Velikost ročaja za palico za golf: Jumbo; Jumbo Plus; Mladinska; Ženska; Srednja velikost; Oversize; Oversize +1/8; Standardna; Standard Plus4; Undersize; Drugo
nl: Golfgrip maat: Jumbo; Jumbo Plus; Junior; Dames; Midsize; Oversize; Oversize +1/8; Standaard; Standard Plus4; Undersize; Anders
ru: Размер грипа для гольфа: Джамбо; Джамбо плюс; Юниорский; Женский; Средний; Оверсайз; Оверсайз +1/8; Стандартный; Стандартный Plus4; Уменьшенный; Другое
th: ขนาดด้ามจับไม้กอล์ฟ: จัมโบ้; จัมโบ้พลัส; จูเนียร์; ผู้หญิง; ขนาดกลาง; โอเวอร์ไซส์; โอเวอร์ไซส์ +1/8; มาตรฐาน; มาตรฐานพลัสโฟร์; อันเดอร์ไซส์; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Golfo rankenos dydis: Labai didelis („Jumbo“); Labai didelis plius („Jumbo Plus“); Jaunių; Moterų; Vidutinio dydžio; Padidintas („Oversize“); Padidintas +1/8; Standartinis; Standartinis „Plus4“; Sumažintas; Kita